third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SFX Y Y 200
SFX Y   аса       асат      аса
SFX Y   аса       асе       аса
SFX Y   аса       асейки    аса
SFX Y   аса       асели     аса
SFX Y   аса       аселите   аса
SFX Y   аса       асем      аса
SFX Y   аса       асен      аса
SFX Y   аса       асена     аса
SFX Y   аса       асената   аса
SFX Y   аса       асени     аса
SFX Y   аса       асените   аса
SFX Y   аса       асения    аса
SFX Y   аса       асеният   аса
SFX Y   аса       асено     аса
SFX Y   аса       асеното   аса
SFX Y   аса       асете     аса
SFX Y   аса       асеш      аса
SFX Y   аса       асеше     аса
SFX Y   аса       аси       аса
SFX Y   аса       асла      аса
SFX Y   аса       аслата    аса
SFX Y   аса       асли      аса
SFX Y   аса       аслите    аса
SFX Y   аса       аслия     аса
SFX Y   аса       аслият    аса
SFX Y   аса       асло      аса
SFX Y   аса       аслото    аса
SFX Y   аса       асох      аса
SFX Y   аса       асоха     аса
SFX Y   аса       асохме    аса
SFX Y   аса       асохте    аса
SFX Y   аса       асъл      аса
SFX Y   аса       асял      аса
SFX Y   аса       асяла     аса
SFX Y   аса       асялата   аса
SFX Y   аса       асялия    аса
SFX Y   аса       асялият   аса
SFX Y   аса       асяло     аса
SFX Y   аса       асялото   аса
SFX Y   аса       асях      аса
SFX Y   аса       асяха     аса
SFX Y   аса       асяхме    аса
SFX Y   аса       асяхте    аса
SFX Y   аса       асящ      аса
SFX Y   аса       асяща     аса
SFX Y   аса       асящата   аса
SFX Y   аса       асящи     аса
SFX Y   аса       асящите   аса
SFX Y   аса       асящия    аса
SFX Y   аса       асящият   аса
SFX Y   аса       асящо     аса
SFX Y   аса       асящото   аса
SFX Y   еса       есат      еса
SFX Y   еса       есе       еса
SFX Y   еса       есейки    еса
SFX Y   еса       есели     еса
SFX Y   еса       еселите   еса
SFX Y   еса       есем      еса
SFX Y   еса       есен      еса
SFX Y   еса       есена     еса
SFX Y   еса       есената   еса
SFX Y   еса       есени     еса
SFX Y   еса       есените   еса
SFX Y   еса       есения    еса
SFX Y   еса       есеният   еса
SFX Y   еса       есено     еса
SFX Y   еса       есеното   еса
SFX Y   еса       есете     еса
SFX Y   еса       есеш      еса
SFX Y   еса       есеше     еса
SFX Y   еса       еси       еса
SFX Y   еса       есла      еса
SFX Y   еса       еслата    еса
SFX Y   еса       если      еса
SFX Y   еса       еслите    еса
SFX Y   еса       еслия     еса
SFX Y   еса       еслият    еса
SFX Y   еса       есло      еса
SFX Y   еса       еслото    еса
SFX Y   еса       есох      еса
SFX Y   еса       есоха     еса
SFX Y   еса       есохме    еса
SFX Y   еса       есохте    еса
SFX Y   еса       есъл      еса
SFX Y   еса       есял      еса
SFX Y   еса       есяла     еса
SFX Y   еса       есялата   еса
SFX Y   еса       есялия    еса
SFX Y   еса       есялият   еса
SFX Y   еса       есяло     еса
SFX Y   еса       есялото   еса
SFX Y   еса       есях      еса
SFX Y   еса       есяха     еса
SFX Y   еса       есяхме    еса
SFX Y   еса       есяхте    еса
SFX Y   еса       есящ      еса
SFX Y   еса       есяща     еса
SFX Y   еса       есящата   еса
SFX Y   еса       есящи     еса
SFX Y   еса       есящите   еса
SFX Y   еса       есящия    еса
SFX Y   еса       есящият   еса
SFX Y   еса       есящо     еса
SFX Y   еса       есящото   еса
SFX Y   ка        кат       ка
SFX Y   ка        кла       ка
SFX Y   ка        клата     ка
SFX Y   ка        кли       ка
SFX Y   ка        клите     ка
SFX Y   ка        клия      ка
SFX Y   ка        клият     ка
SFX Y   ка        кло       ка
SFX Y   ка        клото     ка
SFX Y   ка        кох       ка
SFX Y   ка        коха      ка
SFX Y   ка        кохме     ка
SFX Y   ка        кохте     ка
SFX Y   ка        къл       ка
SFX Y   ка        чащ       ка
SFX Y   ка        чаща      ка
SFX Y   ка        чащата    ка
SFX Y   ка        чащи      ка
SFX Y   ка        чащите    ка
SFX Y   ка        чащия     ка
SFX Y   ка        чащият    ка
SFX Y   ка        чащо      ка
SFX Y   ка        чащото    ка
SFX Y   ка        че        ка
SFX Y   ка        чейки     ка
SFX Y   ка        чел       ка
SFX Y   ка        чела      ка
SFX Y   ка        челата    ка
SFX Y   ка        чели      ка
SFX Y   ка        челите    ка
SFX Y   ка        челия     ка
SFX Y   ка        челият    ка
SFX Y   ка        чело      ка
SFX Y   ка        челото    ка
SFX Y   ка        чем       ка
SFX Y   ка        чен       ка
SFX Y   ка        чена      ка
SFX Y   ка        чената    ка
SFX Y   ка        чени      ка
SFX Y   ка        чените    ка
SFX Y   ка        чения     ка
SFX Y   ка        ченият    ка
SFX Y   ка        чено      ка
SFX Y   ка        ченото    ка
SFX Y   ка        чете      ка
SFX Y   ка        чех       ка
SFX Y   ка        чеха      ка
SFX Y   ка        чехме     ка
SFX Y   ка        чехте     ка
SFX Y   ка        чеш       ка
SFX Y   ка        чеше      ка
SFX Y   ка        чи        ка
SFX Y   ча        ка        ча
SFX Y   ча        кал       ча
SFX Y   ча        кала      ча
SFX Y   ча        калата    ча
SFX Y   ча        кали      ча
SFX Y   ча        калите    ча
SFX Y   ча        калия     ча
SFX Y   ча        калият    ча
SFX Y   ча        кало      ча
SFX Y   ча        калото    ча
SFX Y   ча        ках       ча
SFX Y   ча        каха      ча
SFX Y   ча        кахме     ча
SFX Y   ча        кахте     ча
SFX Y   ча        чат       ча
SFX Y   ча        че        ча
SFX Y   ча        чейки     ча
SFX Y   ча        чел       ча
SFX Y   ча        чела      ча
SFX Y   ча        челата    ча
SFX Y   ча        чели      ча
SFX Y   ча        челите    ча
SFX Y   ча        челия     ча
SFX Y   ча        челият    ча
SFX Y   ча        чело      ча
SFX Y   ча        челото    ча
SFX Y   ча        чем       ча
SFX Y   ча        чете      ча
SFX Y   ча        чех       ча
SFX Y   ча        чеха      ча
SFX Y   ча        чехме     ча
SFX Y   ча        чехте     ча
SFX Y   ча        чеш       ча
SFX Y   ча        чеше      ча
SFX Y   ча        чещ       ча
SFX Y   ча        чеща      ча
SFX Y   ча        чещата    ча
SFX Y   ча        чещи      ча
SFX Y   ча        чещите    ча
SFX Y   ча        чещия     ча
SFX Y   ча        чещият    ча
SFX Y   ча        чещо      ча
SFX Y   ча        чещото    ча
SFX Y   ча        чи        ча
